North Dakota, session 69, SB2168.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. AMENDMENT. Section 20.1-01-21 of the North Dakota Century Code is
amended and reenacted as follows:
20.1-01-21. Hunting near occupied buildinga building, occupied structure, or storage
structure without permission unlawful.
No personAn individual may not hunt or pursue game upon the premises of another, within
four hundred forty yards [402.34 meters] of any occupied building,a building, occupied structure,
or storage structure without consent of the person occupying such buildingthe consent of the
property owner.
Page No. 1 25.0493.01000